Tennessee, session 114, HB2303.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-3507(c), is amended by
deleting "June 30" wherever it appears and substituting "June 15".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2303
012683
- 1 -